Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,117
Surrender of dealer license plates; when.

When any motor vehicle or trailer dealer's or manufacturer's license has been revoked or otherwise terminated, it shall be the duty of such dealer or manufacturer to immediately surrender to the department or to the Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Board any dealer license plates issued to him or her for the current year. Failure of such dealer or manufacturer to immediately surrender such dealer license plates to the department upon demand by the department shall be unlawful.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 117.